Washington statutes.
RCW 3.34.025

District judge positions—Approval and agreement.

Any additional district judge positions created under RCW 3.34.020 shall be effective only if the legislative authority of the affected county documents its approval of any additional positions and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of such additional judicial positions as provided by statute. The additional expenses include, but are not limited to, expenses incurred for court facilities. The legislative authority of any such county may, at its discretion, phase in any judicial positions over a period of time not to exceed two years from the effective date of the additional district judge positions.

[ 1991 c 313 s 3.]

NOTES:

District judge position for Clark county—2005 c 91: "For the purposes of RCW 3.34.025, the district judge position for Clark county created in chapter 97, Laws of 2003, is hereby re-created as of July 24, 2005." [ 2005 c 91 s 2.]